Washington statutes.
RCW 43.250.070

Investment pool—Separate accounts for participants—Monthly status report.

The state treasurer shall keep a separate account for each participant having funds in the investment pool. Each separate account shall record the individual amounts deposited in the investment pool, the date of withdrawals, and the earnings credited or paid. The state treasurer shall report monthly the status of the respective account to each participant having funds in the pool during the previous month.

[ 1990 c 106 s 4; 1986 c 294 s 7.]